lt-LT: Laikrodžio rodyklės stilius: Alpha; Rodyklė; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Lapas; Švytintis; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Kastuvas; Lazdelė; Kardas; Kita
zh-CN: 钟表指针样式: 阿尔法型; 箭头形; 棒形; 宝玑型; 教堂型; 多芬型; 叶片型; 百合型; 叶形; 夜光; 三叉星型; 潜水型; 梨形; 镂空型; 锹形; 棒/棍形; 剑形; 其他
el: Στυλ δεικτών ρολογιού: Alpha; Βέλος; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Φύλλο; Φωτεινό; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Spade; Ραβδί; Ξίφος; Άλλο
nl: Stijl van klokwijzers: Alfa; Pijl; Baton; Breguet; Kathedraal; Dauphine; Bladvorm; Fleur-de-lis; Blad; Lumineus; Mercedes; Plongeur; Peervorm; Skelet; Spade; Stok; Zwaard; Overig
pt-BR: Estilo de ponteiro do relógio: Alfa; Seta; Bastão; Breguet; Catedral; Dauphine; Ponteiro folha; Flor-de-lis; Folha; Luminoso; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Esqueleto; Ponteiro de lança; Ponteiro palito; Espada; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на стрелката на часовника: Alpha; Стрелковидни; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Листовидни; Луминесцентни; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Пика; Прави; Саби; Друго
en: Clock hand style: Alpha; Arrow; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Leaf; Luminous; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Spade; Stick; Sword; Other
pl: Typ wskazówek zegara: Alpha; Strzałka; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Liść; Luminescencyjny; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Wskazówki szkieletowe; Szpadel; Prosty; Miecz; Pozostałe
th: รูปแบบเข็มนาฬิกา: อัลฟา; ลูกศร; บาตอง; เบรเกต์; คาธีดรัล; ดอฟีน; เฟยล์; เฟลอร์-เดอ-ลีส์; ทรงใบไม้; เรืองแสง; เมอร์เซเดส; ปลองเจอร์; ปอร์; หน้าปัดเปลือย; ทรงโพดำ; แท่ง; ทรงดาบ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Estilo de ponteiro de relógio: Alfa; Seta; Bastão; Breguet; Catedral; Dauphine; Folha; Flor-de-lis; Folha; Luminoso; Mercedes; Mergulhador; Pera; Esqueleto; Espada; Ponteiro; Espada; Outro
hr-HR: Stil kazaljke sata: Alpha; Strelica; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; List; Svjetleći; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Lopatica; Štapić; Mač; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu dáng kim đồng hồ: Alpha; Mũi tên; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Hoa diên vĩ; Lá cây; Phát quang; Mercedes; Kim thợ lặn; Hình quả lê; Khung xương; Hình bích; Que; Kiếm; Khác
sl-SI: Slog urnega kazalca: Alfa; Puščica; Štafetna palica; Breguet; Katedrala; Dauphine; List; Lilija; List; Svetleč; Mercedes; Potapljač; Hruška; Okostje; Lopata; Palica; Meč; Druga
ja: 時計針のスタイル: アルファ; 矢印; バトン; ブレゲ; 大聖堂; ドーフィネ; 葉; フルール・ド・リス; 葉; ルミナス; メルセデス; プロンジュール; ポワール; スケルトン; スペード; スティック; 刀剣; その他
sk-SK: Dizajn ručičiek hodín: Alfa; Šípka; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Ľalia; List; Svetelný; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Plochá ručička; Tyčinka; Meč; Iné
tr: Saat ibresi stili: Alfa; Oklu; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Yaprak; Fosforlu; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; İskelet; Maça tipi; Çubuk; Kılıç; Diğer
sv: Design av klockvisare: Alfa; Pil; Batong; Breguet; Katedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Blad; Lysande; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skelett; Spade; Stift; Svärd; Övrigt
cs: Styl hodinových ručiček: Alpha; Šipka; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; List; Svítící; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Pikový list; Jednoduché; Meč; Jiné
fr: Style des aiguilles de l’horloge: Alpha; Flèche; Bâton; Breguet; Cathédrale; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur de lys; Feuille; Lumineux; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Squelette; Bêche; Bâton; Épée; Autre
ko: 시계 바늘 스타일: 알파; 화살형; 바톤; 브레게; 카테드랄; 도핀; 푀이유; 플뢰르 드 리스; 나뭇잎형; 야광형; 메르세데스; 플롱저; 포이레; 스켈레톤; 스페이드형; 스틱형; 칼날형; 기타
da: Urviserstil: Alpha; Pil; Baton; Breguet; Katedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Blad; Lysende; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skelet; Spade; Pind; Sværd; Andet
zh-TW: 鐘針樣式: 刀型針; 箭形; 棒型針; 寶璣針; 教堂針; 太妃針; 葉形針; 百合針; 葉形; 夜光; 賓士針; 潛水針; 黑桃針; 鏤空針; 黑桃形; 棒狀; 劍形; 其他
es: Estilo de manecilla de reloj: Alfa; Aguja; Batuta; Breguet; Catedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Hoja; Luminoso; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Pala cuadrada; Palillo; Espada; Otros
fi: Kellon viisarin tyyli: Alfa; Nuoli; Tanko; Breguet; Katedraali; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Lehti; Loistava; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Luuranko; Lapio; Puikko; Miekka; Muu
de: Uhrzeigerstil: Alpha; Pfeil; Taktstock; Breguet; Kathedrale; Dauphine; Blatt; Fleur-de-lis; Blatt; Leuchtend; Mercedes; Plongeur; Birne; Skeleton; Spaten; Stick; Schwert; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Stilul limbii de ceas: Alfa; Săgeată; Baston; Breguet; Catedrală; Dauphine; Frunză; Flori de crin; Frunză; Luminos; Mercedes; Scafandru; Pară; Schelet; Pică; Stick; Sabie; Altele
it: Stile delle lancette dell'orologio: Alfa; Freccia; Bastone; Breguet; Cattedrale; Dauphine; Foglia; Giglio; Foglia; Luminoso; Mercedes; Plongeur; Pera; Scheletro; Vanga; Stick; A spada; Altro
nb: Klokkeviserstil: Alfa; Pil; Stafettpinnen; Breguet; Katedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Blad; Lysende; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skjelett; Småspade; Pinne; Sverd; Annet
ru: Стиль стрелок часов: Альфа; Стрела; Жезл; Бреге; Собор; Дофин; Фейль; Флер-де-лис; Лист; Светящаяся; Мерседес; Плонжер; Пуаре; Скелетон; Пика; Палочка; Меч; Другой
hu: Óramutató stílusa: Alpha; Nyíl; Baton; Breguet; Cathedral; Dauphine; Feuille; Fleur-de-lis; Levél; Világító; Mercedes; Plongeur; Poire; Skeleton; Ásó; Rúd; Kard; Egyéb